libstemmer_c/algorithms/dutch_adj/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
strings ( ch )
integers ( x p1 p2 )
booleans ( Y_found stemmed /*GE_removed*/ )

routines (
   prelude
   R1 R2
   C V VX
   lengthen_V
   Step_1 Step_2 Step_3 Step_4 Step_7
   Step_6
//  Step_1c
//   Lose_prefix
//   Lose_infix
   measure
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WX AOU AIOU)

stringescapes {}

stringdef '   hex '27'  // yuk

define v        'aeiouy'
define v_WX     v + 'wx'
define AOU      'aou'
define AIOU     'aiou'

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef e"   hex 'EB'
stringdef i"   hex 'EF'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'
stringdef u"   hex 'FC'

stringdef a'   hex 'E1'
stringdef e'   hex 'E9'
stringdef i'   hex 'ED'
stringdef o'   hex 'F3'
stringdef u'   hex 'FA'

stringdef e`   hex 'E8'

//define v_I     v + 'I'
//define v_j     v + 'j'

define prelude as (
    test repeat (
        [substring] among(
            '{a"}' '{a'}'
                (<- 'a')
            '{e"}' '{e'}'
                (<- 'e')
            '{i"}' '{i'}'
                (<- 'i')
            '{o"}' '{o'}'
                (<- 'o')
            '{u"}' '{u'}'
                (<- 'u')
            ''  (next)
        ) //or next
    )
    try(['y'] <- 'Y')
    repeat goto (
        v [('i'] v <- 'I') or
           ('y']   <- 'Y')
    )
)


backwardmode (

    define R1 as (setmark x $x >= p1)
    define R2 as (setmark x $x >= p2)

    define V  as test (v or 'ij')
    define VX as test (next v or 'ij')
    define C  as test (not 'ij' non-v)

    define lengthen_V as do (
        non-v_WX [ (AOU] test (non-v or atlimit)) or
                   ('e'] test (non-v or atlimit
                               not AIOU
                               not (next AIOU non-v)))
        ->ch insert ch
    )

    define Step_1 as
    (
        [among ( (])

            '{'}s' (delete)
            's'    (R1 not ('t' R1) C delete)
            'ies'  (R1 <-'ie')
            'es'
                   (('ar' R1 C ] delete lengthen_V) or
                    ('er' R1 C ] delete) or
                    (R1 C <-'e'))

            'aus'  (R1 V <-'au')
	    'alen' (R1 <- 'aal')
            'ieen' (R1 <- 'ie')
    	    'ven'  (R1 <- 'f')
	    'en'   (('hed' R1 ] <-'heid') or
                    ('nd' delete) or
                    ('d' R1 C ] delete) or
                    ('i' or 'j' V delete) or
                    (R1 C delete lengthen_V))
            'nde'  (<-'nd')
        )
    )

    define Step_2 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'je'   (('{'}t' ] delete) or
                    ('et'   ] R1 C delete) or
                    ('rnt'  ] <-'rn') or
                    ('t'    ] R1 VX delete) or
                    ('ink'  ] <-'ing') or
                    ('mp'   ] <-'m') or
                    ('{'}'  ] R1 delete) or
                    (] R1 C delete))
            'ge'   (R1 <-'g')
            'lijke'(R1 <-'lijk')
            'ische'(R1 <-'isch')
            'de'   (R1 C delete)
            'te'   (R1 <-'t')
            'se'   (R1 <-'s')
            're'   (R1 <-'r')
            'le'   (R1 delete attach 'l' lengthen_V)
            'ene'  (R1 C delete attach 'en' lengthen_V)
            'ieve' (R1 C <-'ief')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'atie'  (R1 <-'eer')
            'iteit' (R1 delete lengthen_V)
            'heid'
            'sel'
            'ster'  (R1 delete)
            'rder'  (<-'r')
            'ing'
            'isme'
            'erij'  (R1 delete lengthen_V)
            'arij'  (R1 C <-'aar')
            'fie'   (R2 delete attach 'f' lengthen_V)
            'gie'   (R2 delete attach 'g' lengthen_V)
            'tst'   (R1 C <-'t')
            'dst'   (R1 C <-'d')
        )
    )

    define Step_4 as
    (
        (   [among ( (])
                'ioneel'  (R1 <-'ie')
                'atief'   (R1 <-'eer')
                'baar'    (R1 delete)
                'naar'    (R1 V <-'n')
                'laar'    (R1 V <-'l')
                'raar'    (R1 V <-'r')
                'tant'    (R1 <-'teer')
                'lijker'
                'lijkst'  (R1 <-'lijk')
                'achtig'
                'achtiger'
                'achtigst'(R1 delete)
                'eriger'
                'erigst'
                'erig'
                'end'     (R1 C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
        or
        (   [among ( (])
                'iger'
                'igst'
                'ig'      (R1 C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
    )

    define Step_7 as
    (
        [among ( (])
	    'iee'  (<-'ie')
	    'eee'  (<-'ee')
            'kt'   (<-'k')
            'ft'   (<-'f')
            'pt'   (<-'p')
        )
    )

    define Step_6 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'bb'   (<-'b')
            'cc'   (<-'c')
            'dd'   (<-'d')
            'ff'   (<-'f')
            'gg'   (<-'g')
            'hh'   (<-'h')
            'jj'   (<-'j')
            'kk'   (<-'k')
            'll'   (<-'l')
            'mm'   (<-'m')
            'nn'   (<-'n')
            'pp'   (<-'p')
            'qq'   (<-'q')
            'rr'   (<-'r')
            'ss'   (<-'s')
            'tt'   (<-'t')
            'vv'   (<-'v')
            'ww'   (<-'w')
            'xx'   (<-'x')
            'zz'   (<-'z')
            'v'    (<-'f')
            'z'    (<-'s')
        )
    )
/*
    define Step_1c as
    (
        [among ( (] R1 C)
            'd' (not ('n' R1) delete)
            't' (not ('h' R1) delete)
        )
    )
*/
)
/*
define Lose_prefix as (
    ['ge'] test hop 3 (goto v goto non-v)
    set GE_removed
    delete
)

define Lose_infix as (
    next
    gopast (['ge']) test hop 3 (goto v goto non-v)
    set GE_removed
    delete
)
*/
define measure as (
    do (
        tolimit
        setmark p1
        setmark p2
    )
    do(
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p1
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p2
    )

)
define stem as (
    prelude
    unset Y_found
    unset stemmed
    do ( ['y'] <-'Y' set Y_found )
    do repeat(goto (v  ['y'])<-'Y' set Y_found )

    measure

    backwards (
            do (Step_1 set stemmed )
            do (Step_2 set stemmed )
            do (Step_3 set stemmed )
            do (Step_4 set stemmed )
    )
/*
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_prefix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed Step_1c)
        )
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_infix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed Step_1c)
        )
*/
    backwards (
            do (Step_7 set stemmed )
            do (stemmed or Step_6)
        )
    do(Y_found  repeat(goto (['Y']) <-'y'))
)
